Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1 URBAN RENEWAL
31-25-108. Disaster areas.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part 1, when the governing body certifies that an area within the municipality is in need of redevelopment or rehabilitation as a result of a flood, fire, hurricane, earthquake, storm, or other catastrophe respecting which the governor has certified the need for disaster assistance under Public Law 875, Eighty-first Congress, or other federal law, such area shall be deemed a blighted area, and the authority situated in such municipality may prepare and submit to such governing body a proposed urban renewal plan and proposed urban renewal project for such area or for any portion thereof, and such governing body may, by resolution, approve such proposed urban renewal plan and urban renewal project with or without modifications without regard to the provisions of this part 1 requiring a general or master plan for the physical development of the municipality as a whole, review by the planning commission, or a public hearing.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1168, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-108 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-109. Issuance of bonds by an authority.

An authority has power to issue bonds of the authority from time to time in its discretion to finance its activities or operations under this part 1, including but not limited to the repayment with interest of any advances or loans of funds made to the authority by the federal government or other source for any surveys or plans made or to be made by the authority in exercising its powers under this part 1 and also has power to issue refunding or other bonds of the authority from time to time in its discretion for the payment, retirement, renewal, or extension of any bonds previously issued by it under this section and to provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds previously issued under this section.

Bonds which are issued under this section may be general obligation bonds of the authority to the payment of which, as to principal and interest and premiums (if any), the full faith, credit, and assets (acquired and to be acquired) of the authority are irrevocably pledged.

Such bonds may be special obligations of the authority which, as to principal and interest and premiums (if any), are payable solely from and secured only by a pledge of any income, proceeds, revenues, or funds of the authority derived or to be derived by it from or held or to be held by it in connection with its undertaking of any project of the authority, including, without limitation, funds to be paid to an authority pursuant to section 31-25-107 (9) and including any grants or contributions of funds made or to be made by it with respect to any such project and any funds derived or to be derived by it from or held or to be held by it in connection with its sale, lease, rental, transfer, retention, management, rehabilitation, clearance, development, redevelopment, preparation for development or redevelopment, or its operation or other utilization or disposition of any real or personal property acquired or to be acquired by it or held or to be held by it for any of the purposes of this part 1 and including any loans, grants, or contributions of funds made or to be made to it by the federal government in aid of any project of the authority or in aid of any of its other activities or operations.

Such bonds may be special obligations of the authority which, as to principal and interest and premiums (if any), are payable solely from and secured only by a pledge of any loans, grants, or contributions of funds made or to be made to it by the federal government or other source in aid of any project of the authority or in aid of any of its other activities or operations.

Such bonds may be contingent special obligations of the authority which, as to principal and interest and premiums (if any), are payable solely from any funds available or becoming available to the authority for its undertaking of the project involved in the particular activities or operations with respect to which such contingent special obligations are issued but so payable only in the event such funds are or become available as provided in this subsection (2).

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, any bonds which are issued under this section, other than the contingent special obligations covered by paragraph (d) of subsection (2) of this section, may be additionally secured as to the payment of the principal and interest and premiums (if any) by a mortgage of any urban renewal project, or any part thereof, title to which is then or thereafter in the authority or of any other real or personal property or interests therein then owned or thereafter acquired by the authority.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, general obligation bonds which are issued under this section may be additionally secured as to payment of the principal and interest and premiums (if any) as provided in either paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection (2) of this section, with or without being also additionally secured as to payment of the principal and interest and premiums (if any) by a mortgage as provided in subsection (3) of this section or a trust agreement as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any bonds which are issued under this section may be additionally secured as to the payment of the principal and interest and premiums (if any) by a trust agreement by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state of Colorado.

Bonds which are issued under this section shall not constitute an indebtedness of the state of Colorado or of any county, municipality, or public body of said state other than the urban renewal authority issuing such bonds and shall not be subject to the provisions of any other law or of the charter of any municipality relating to the authorization, issuance, or sale of bonds.

Bonds which are issued under this section are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempted from all taxes.

Bonds which are issued under this section shall be authorized by a resolution of the authority and may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date, be payable upon demand or mature at such time, bear interest at such rate, be in such denomination, be in such form, either coupon or registered or otherwise, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed (in the name of the authority) in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, be payable at such place, be subject to such callability provisions or terms of redemption (with or without premiums), be secured in such manner, be of such description, contain or be subject to such covenants, provisions, terms, conditions, and agreements (including provisions concerning events of default), and have such other characteristics as may be provided by such resolution or by the trust agreement, indenture, or mortgage, if any, issued pursuant to such resolution. The seal (or a facsimile thereof) of the authority shall be affixed, imprinted, engraved, or otherwise reproduced upon each of its bonds issued under this section. Bonds which are issued under this section shall be executed in the name of the authority by the manual or facsimile signatures of such of its officials as may be designated in the said resolution or trust agreement, indenture, or mortgage; except that at least one signature on each such bond shall be a manual signature. Coupons, if any, attached to such bonds shall bear the facsimile signature of such official of the authority as may be designated as provided in this subsection (8). The said resolution or trust agreement, indenture, or mortgage may provide for the authentication of the pertinent bonds by the trustee.

Bonds which are issued under this section may be sold by the authority in such manner and for such price as the authority, in its discretion, may determine, at par, below par, or above par, at private sale or at public sale after notice published prior to such sale in a newspaper having general circulation in the municipality, or in such other medium of publication as the authority may deem appropriate, or may be exchanged by the authority for other bonds issued by it under this section. Bonds which are issued under this section may be sold by it to the federal government at private sale at par, below par, or above par, and, in the event that less than all of the authorized principal amount of such bonds is sold by the authority to the federal government, the balance or any portion of the balance may be sold by the authority at private sale at par, below par, or above par, at an interest cost to the authority of not to exceed the interest cost to it of the portion of the bonds sold by it to the federal government.

In case any of the officials of the authority whose signatures or facsimile signatures appear on any of its bonds or coupons which are issued under this section cease to be such officials before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures or facsimile signatures, as the case may be, shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such officials had remained in office until such delivery.

Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds which are issued pursuant to this section are fully negotiable.

In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of any bond which is issued under this section or the security therefor, any such bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by the authority in connection with an urban renewal project or any activity or operation of the authority under this part 1 shall be conclusively deemed to have been issued for such purposes; and such urban renewal project or such operation or activity, as the case may be, shall be conclusively deemed to have been initiated, planned, located, undertaken, accomplished, and carried out in accordance with the provisions of this part 1.

Pending the preparation of any definitive bonds under this section, an authority may issue its interim certificates or receipts or its temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for such definitive bonds when the latter have been executed and are available for delivery.

Persons retained or employed by an authority as advisors or consultants for the purpose of rendering financial advice and assistance may purchase or participate in the purchase or in the distribution of its bonds when such bonds are offered at public or private sale.

No commissioner or other officer of an authority issuing bonds under this section and no person executing such bonds is liable personally on such bonds or is subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1169, § 1, effective July 1; (2)(b) amended, p. 1277, § 2, effective July 16.

L. 76:

(9) and (14) amended, p. 699, § 1, effective April 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-109 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-110. Property of an authority exempt from taxes and from levy and sale by virtue of an execution.

All property of an authority, including but not limited to all funds owned or held by it for any of the purposes of this part 1, shall be exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and no such execution or other judicial process shall issue against the same nor shall a judgment against the authority be a charge or lien upon such property; except that the foregoing provisions of this subsection (1) shall not apply to or limit the right of obligees to foreclose or otherwise enforce any mortgage, deed of trust, trust agreement, indenture, or other encumbrance of the authority or the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given by the authority pursuant to this part 1 on its rents, income, proceeds, revenues, loans, grants, contributions, and other funds and assets derived or arising from any project of the authority or from any of its operations or activities under this part 1.

All property of an authority acquired or held by it for any of the purposes of this part 1, including but not limited to all funds of an authority acquired or held by it for any of said purposes, are declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes, and such property and the authority shall be exempt from all taxes of the state of Colorado or any other public body thereof; except that such tax exemption shall terminate when the authority sells, leases, or otherwise disposes of the particular property to a purchaser, lessee, or other alienee which is not a public body entitled to tax exemption with respect to such property.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1171, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-110 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-111. Title of purchaser, lessee, or transferee.

Any instrument executed by an authority and purporting to convey any right, title, or interest of the authority in any property under this part 1 shall be conclusively presumed to have been made and executed in compliance with the provisions of this part 1 insofar as title or other interest of any bona fide purchasers, lessees, or transferees of such property is concerned.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1172, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-111 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-112. Cooperation by public bodies with urban renewal authorities.

Any public body, within its powers, purposes, and functions and for the purpose of aiding an authority in or in connection with the planning or undertaking pursuant to this part 1 of any plans, projects, programs, works, operations, or activities of such authority whose area of operation is situated in whole or in part within the area in which such public body is authorized to act, upon such terms as such public body shall determine, may:

Sell, convey, or lease any of such public body's property or grant easements, licenses, or other rights or privileges therein to such authority;

Incur the entire expense of any public improvements made by such public body in exercising the powers mentioned in this section;

Do all things necessary to aid or cooperate with such authority in or in connection with the planning or undertaking of any such plans, projects, programs, works, operations, or activities;

Enter into agreements with such authority respecting action to be taken pursuant to any of the powers set forth in this part 1, including agreements respecting the planning or undertaking of any such plans, projects, programs, works, operations, or activities which such public body is otherwise empowered to undertake;

Cause public buildings and public facilities, including parks, playgrounds, recreational, community, educational, water, garbage disposal, sewer, sewage, sewerage, or drainage facilities, or any other public works, improvements, facilities, or utilities which such public body is otherwise empowered to undertake, to be furnished within the area in which such public body is authorized to act;

Furnish, dedicate, accept dedication of, open, close, vacate, install, construct, reconstruct, pave, repave, repair, rehabilitate, improve, grade, regrade, plan, or replan public streets, roads, roadways, parkways, alleys, sidewalks, and other public ways or places within the area in which such public body is authorized to act to the extent that such items or matters are, under any other law, otherwise within the jurisdiction of such public body;

Plan or replan and zone or rezone any part of the area under the jurisdiction of such public body or make exceptions from its building regulations; and

Cause administrative or other services to be furnished to such authority.

If at any time title to or possession of the whole or any portion of any project of the authority under this part 1 is held by any governmental agency or public body (other than such authority) which is authorized by any law to engage in the undertaking, carrying out, or administration of any such project (including any agency or instrumentality of the United States), the provisions of the agreements referred to in paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of this section shall inure to the benefit of and may be enforced by such governmental agency or public body.

Any public body referred to as such in subsection (1) of this section may (in addition to its authority pursuant to any other law to issue its bonds for any purposes) issue and sell its bonds for any of the purposes of such public body which are stated in this section; except that any such bonds of such a public body which are issuable as provided in this subsection (3) may be issued only in the manner and otherwise in conformity with the applicable provisions and limitations prescribed by the state constitution and the laws of this state and, in the case of a home rule municipality, the applicable provisions of its home rule charter for the authorization and issuance by such public body of its general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, special assessment bonds, or special obligation bonds, accordingly as the bonds are general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, special assessment bonds, or special obligation bonds.

Without limiting the generality of any of the provisions of this part 1, but within any limitations provided by the applicable provisions of the state constitution and, in the case of any home rule municipality, the applicable provisions of its home rule charter:

Any public body may appropriate such of its funds and make such expenditures of its funds as it deems necessary for it to undertake any of its powers, functions, or activities mentioned in this part 1 including, particularly, its powers, functions, and activities mentioned in subsections (1) to (3) of this section; and

Any municipality may levy taxes and assessments in order for it to undertake, carry out, or accomplish any of its powers, functions, or activities mentioned in this part 1, including, particularly, its powers, functions, and activities mentioned in the provisions of subsections (1) to (3) of this section.

For the advancement of the public interest and for the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, acquisition, demolition, rehabilitation, construction, or relocation, or otherwise assisting the operation or activities of an urban renewal project located wholly or partly within the area in which it is authorized to act, a public body may enter into agreements which may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, with an authority respecting action taken or to be taken pursuant to any of the powers granted by this part 1.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1172, § 1, effective July 1; (5) R&RE, p. 1278, § 3, effective July 16.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-112 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-112.5. Inclusion of unincorporated territory in urban renewal area.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 1, an urban renewal plan, urban renewal project, or urban renewal area may include unincorporated territory that is outside the boundaries of a municipality but contiguous to a portion of the urban renewal area located within the municipality. No such territory shall be included in the plan, project, or area without the consent of the board of county commissioners exercising jurisdiction over the unincorporated territory proposed for inclusion and the consent of each owner of, and each holder of a recorded mortgage or deed of trust encumbering, real property within the unincorporated area proposed for inclusion.

In addition to the procedures for approval of a proposed urban renewal plan by the governing body as required by section 31-25-107, the unincorporated territory may be included in the urban renewal plan, project, or area upon satisfaction of each of the following additional requirements:

The board of county commissioners makes a determination that the urban renewal area proposed for inclusion in the plan is a slum or blighted area in accordance with the procedures set forth in section 31-25-107 (1).

The board of county commissioners refers the urban renewal plan to the planning commission of the county for a determination as to the conformity of the urban renewal plan with the general plan for development for the county in accordance with the procedures specified in section 31-25-107 (2).

The board of county commissioners conducts a public hearing and makes findings and a determination to approve inclusion of the unincorporated territory in the urban renewal plan, project, or area in accordance with the procedures set forth in section 31-25-107 (3), (4), (5), and (6).

The board of county commissioners makes an additional finding, prior to approving the inclusion, that each owner of, and each holder of a recorded mortgage or deed of trust encumbering, real property in the unincorporated territory proposed for inclusion in the urban renewal plan, project, or area consents to the inclusion.

The board of county commissioners determines whether the unincorporated territory shall be included in any provision for the division of taxes in the urban renewal area as authorized by section 31-25-107 (9), and, if so determined, the board notifies the county assessor of such inclusion as required by section 31-25-107 (10).

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 1, the requirements of section 31-25-107 (3.5) shall not apply to any urban renewal plan proposed and approved pursuant to this section.

Any urban renewal plan approved in accordance with this section may be modified as provided in section 31-25-107 (3)(a); except that a modification shall be approved by the board of county commissioners, the governing body, and the authority.

An authority, a municipality, and a county may, consistent with the requirements of this section, enter into an intergovernmental agreement to further effectuate the purposes of this section and to provide for the inclusion of unincorporated territory in an urban renewal area.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 278, § 1, effective April 1.

31-25-113. Authorities to have no power of taxation.

No authority created by this part 1 has any power to levy or assess any ad valorem taxes, personal property taxes, or any other forms of taxes, including special assessments against any property.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1174, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-113 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-114. Cumulative clause.

The powers conferred by this part 1 shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1174, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-114 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-115. Transfer - abolishment.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 1, the governing body of a municipality may designate itself as the authority when originally establishing said authority. A transfer of an existing authority to the governing body may be accomplished only by majority vote at a regular election.

(1.5) When the governing body of a municipality designates itself as the authority or transfers an existing authority to the governing body pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, one such commissioner on the authority must be appointed by the board of county commissioners of the county in which the territorial boundaries of the urban renewal authority area are located, one such commissioner must also be a board member of a special district selected by agreement of the special districts levying a mill levy within the boundaries of the urban renewal authority area, and one commissioner must also be an elected member of a board of education of a school district levying a mill levy within the boundaries of the urban renewal authority area. Appointments made pursuant to this subsection (1.5) must be made in accordance with the procedures specified in section 31-25-104 (2).

The governing body of a municipality may by ordinance provide for the abolishment of an urban renewal authority, provided adequate arrangements have been made for payment of any outstanding indebtedness and other obligations of the authority. Any such abolishment shall be effective upon a date set forth in the ordinance, which date shall not be less than six months from the effective date of the ordinance.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1468, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 1984, § 41, effective August 3.

L. 2015:

(1.5) added, (HB 15-1348), ch. 261, p. 989, § 3, effective August 5.

31-25-116. Regional tourism projects.

An urban renewal authority that is designated as a financing entity pursuant to part 3 of article 46 of title 24, C.R.S., shall have all of the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of part 3 of article 46 of title 24, C.R.S., including but not limited to the powers to receive state sales tax increment revenue generated within an approved regional tourism zone, as defined in section 24-46-303 (11), C.R.S., and disburse and otherwise utilize such revenue for all lawful purposes, including but not limited to financing of eligible costs and the design, construction, maintenance, and operation of eligible improvements, as such terms are defined in section 24-46-303, C.R.S., or otherwise incorporated into the commission's conditions of approval.

Notwithstanding the provision of section 31-25-107 (7), authorization to receive state sales tax increment revenue pursuant to part 3 of article 46 of title 24, C.R.S., shall not be considered a material modification to the plan and corresponding changes to the plan may be made by the governing body of the authority to incorporate the use of state sales tax increment revenue without the requirement of submission to or approval by the governing body of a municipality that has established the authority pursuant to section 31-25-104 (1).

Any urban renewal authority that receives state sales tax increment revenue, whether pursuant to designation as a financing entity pursuant to part 3 of article 46 of title 24, C.R.S., or pursuant to a contract entered into with any such financing entity, shall not use the state sales tax increment revenue to acquire property through the exercise of eminent domain.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to eliminate the requirements for the authorization of a new urban renewal authority under this part 1.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-173), ch. 434, p. 2418, § 3, effective June 4.